Maryland, session 2025, HB1497.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Criminal Law
3–209.
(a) Subject to subsection [(b)] (C) of this section, a person charged with a crime
under § 3–202, § 3–203, § 3–204, or § 3–205 of this subtitle may assert any judicially
recognized defense.
(B) (1) SUBJECT TO PARAGRAPH (4) OF THIS SUBSECTION, AN OCCUPANT
OF A DWELLING OR PLACE OF BUSINESS IS JUSTIFIED IN USING ANY DEGREE OF
PHYSICAL FORCE, INCLUDING DEADLY PHYSICAL FORCE, AGAINST ANOTHER
PERSON WHEN:
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb1497*

HOUSE BILL 1497
(I) THE OTHER PERSON HAS MADE AN UNLAWFUL ENTRY INTO
THE DWELLING OR PLACE OF BUSINESS; AND
(II) THE OCCUPANT HAS A REASONABLE BELIEF THAT THE
OTHER PERSON:
1. A. HAS COMMITTED A CRIME IN THE DWELLING OR
PLACE OF BUSINESS IN ADDITION TO THE UNINVITED ENTRY; OR
B. IS COMMITTING OR INTENDS TO COMMIT A CRIME
AGAINST A PERSON OR PROPERTY IN ADDITION TO THE UNINVITED ENTRY; AND
2. MIGHT USE PHYSICAL FORCE, NO MATTER HOW
SLIGHT, AGAINST AN OCCUPANT OF THE DWELLING OR PLACE OF BUSINESS.
(2) AN OCCUPANT OF A DWELLING OR PLACE OF BUSINESS USING
PHYSICAL FORCE, INCLUDING DEADLY PHYSICAL FORCE, IN ACCORDANCE WITH
PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION SHALL BE IMMUNE FROM CRIMINAL
PROSECUTION FOR THE USE OF THE FORCE.
(3) AN OCCUPANT OF A DWELLING OR PLACE OF BUSINESS USING
PHYSICAL FORCE, INCLUDING DEADLY PHYSICAL FORCE, IN ACCORDANCE WITH
PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION SHALL BE IMMUNE FROM CIVIL LIABILITY FOR
INJURIES OR DEATH RESULTING FROM THE USE OF THE FORCE.
(4) THE PROVISIONS OF THIS SECTION DO NOT APPLY IF THE PERSON,
WHO IS SOMEONE OTHER THAN THE OCCUPANT, ENTERED THE DWELLING OR
BUSINESS AND IS:
(I) A LAW ENFORCEMENT OFFICER, FIREFIGHTER, OR
EMERGENCY RESPONSE PERSONNEL PERFORMING OFFICIAL DUTIES; OR
(II) A PERSON WITH EXPRESS PERMISSION TO ENTER THE
DWELLING OR BUSINESS.
[(b)] (C) The discovery or perception of, or belief about, another person’s race,
color, national origin, sex, gender identity, sexual orientation, religious beliefs, or disability,
whether or not accurate, is not a defense to the crime of assault in any degree.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.